Georgia, session 2025_26, HB780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes" means all ad valorem taxes levied by, for, or on behalf of the
City of Greensboro for municipal purposes, except for any ad valorem taxes levied to pay
interest on and to retire bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Adjusted base year assessed value" means the sum of:
(A) The previous adjusted base year assessed value;
H. B. 780
- 1 -

LC 44 3151/AP
(B) An amount equal to the difference between the current year assessed value of the
homestead and the base year assessed value of the homestead, provided that such
amount shall not exceed the total of the previous adjusted base year assessed value of
the homestead multiplied by the inflation rate for the prior year plus 25 basis points;
and
(C) The value of any substantial property change, provided that no such value added
improvements to the homestead shall be duplicated as to the same addition or
improvement.
(3) "Base year assessed value" means:
(A) With respect to an exemption under this section which is first granted to a person
on such person's homestead for the 2026 taxable year, the assessed value for taxable
year 2024, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code
Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A., of the homestead; or
(B) In all other cases, the assessed value, including any final determination of value on
appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A., of the homestead from the
taxable year immediately preceding the taxable year in which the exemption under this
section is first granted to the applicant.
(4) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended, with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than one contiguous acre of homestead property.
(5) "Inflation rate" means the annual inflationary index rate as determined for a given
year by the commissioner of revenue in accordance with subsection (f) of this section.
(6) "Previous adjusted base year assessed value" means:
(A) With respect to the year for which the exemption under this section is first granted
to a person on such person's homestead, the base year assessed value; or
(B) In all other cases, the adjusted base year assessed value of the homestead as
calculated in the taxable year immediately preceding the current year, including any
H. B. 780
- 2 -

LC 44 3151/AP
final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311 of the
O.C.G.A.
(7) "Substantial property change" means any increase or decrease in the assessed value
of a homestead derived from additions or improvements to, or the removal of real
property from, the homestead which occurred after the year in which the base year
assessed value is determined for the homestead. The assessed value of the substantial
property changes shall be established following any final determination of value on
appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A.
(b)(1) Subject to the limitations provided in this section, each resident of the City of
Greensboro is granted an exemption on that person's homestead from ad valorem taxes
in an amount equal to the amount by which the current year assessed value of that
homestead, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code
Section 48-5-311, exceeds its previous adjusted base year assessed value.
(2) Except as provided for in subsection (c) of this section, no exemption provided for
in this subsection shall transfer to any subsequent owner of the property, and the assessed
value of the property shall be as provided by law.
(c) No person shall receive the exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section unless
such person or person's agent files an application with the governing authority of the City of
Greensboro or its designee as will enable the governing authority of the City of Greensboro
or its designee to make a determination regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such
person for such exemption; provided, however, that any person who had previously applied
for a homestead exemption, was allowed such homestead exemption for the 2025 tax year,
and remains eligible for a homestead exemption for that same homestead property in
the 2026 tax year shall be automatically allowed the exemption granted under subsection (b)
of this section for that homestead without further application. The governing authority of the
City of Greensboro or its designee shall provide application forms for this purpose.
H. B. 780
- 3 -

LC 44 3151/AP
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the governing authority of the City of Greensboro or its designee in
the event that such person for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption. The
surviving spouse of the person who has been granted the exemption provided for in
subsection (b) of this section shall continue to receive the exemption provided under
subsection (b) of this section, so long as that surviving spouse continues to occupy the home
as a residence and homestead.
(e)(1) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect
any state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, or county or
independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the homestead
exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu
of any other homestead exemption applicable to ad valorem taxes.
(3) The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not be
applied in addition to any other base year value homestead exemption provided by law
with respect to the City of Greensboro. In any such event, the governing authority of the
City of Greensboro or its designee shall apply only the base year value homestead
exemption that is larger or more beneficial for the taxpayer with respect to the City of
Greensboro.
(f) For the purposes of this section, the commissioner of revenue shall promulgate a
standardized method for determining annual inflationary index rates which reflect the effects
H. B. 780
- 4 -

LC 44 3151/AP
of inflation and deflation on the cost of living for residents of this state for a given calendar
year. Such method may utilize the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or any other similar index established by
100 the federal government if the commissioner of revenue determines that such federal index
101 fairly reflects the effects of inflation and deflation on residents of this state.
102 (g) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
103 beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
104 SECTION 2.
105 In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
106 of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
107 vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
108 SECTION 3.
109 The municipal election superintendent of the City of Greensboro shall call and conduct an
110 election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
111 the City of Greensboro for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct
112 that election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of 2025 and shall issue
113 the call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent
114 shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks
115 immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Greene County. The ballot
116 shall have written or printed thereon the words:
H. B. 780
- 5 -

LC 44 3151/AP
117 "( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from City
118 of Greensboro ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes in an amount equal
119 ( ) NO to the amount by which the current year assessed value of a homestead
120 exceeds the adjusted base year assessed value, including any final
121 determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311 of the
122 O.C.G.A., as amended, of such homestead?"
123 All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
124 to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
125 such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
126 effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
127 as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
128 be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
129 in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Greensboro. It
130 shall be the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of
131 State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and
132 are not intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with
133 this section, any elector of the City of Greensboro may apply for a writ of mandamus to
134 compel the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the
135 court finds that the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall
136 fashion appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such
137 election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
138 elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
139 SECTION 4.
140 Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
141 its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
H. B. 780
- 6 -

LC 44 3151/AP
142 SECTION 5.
143 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 780
- 7 -